Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.080

Additional fee for late registration renewal.

If the renewal of a pesticide registration or special needs registration is not filed by the day the registration expires, an additional fee of fifty dollars shall be assessed and added to the original fee. The additional fee shall be paid by the applicant before the registration renewal for that pesticide shall be issued unless the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that the applicant did not distribute the unregistered pesticide during the period of nonregistration. The payment of the additional fee is not a bar to any prosecution for doing business without proper registry.

[ 2002 c 274 s 4; 1994 c 46 s 2; 1989 c 380 s 7; 1983 c 95 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Expiration date—2002 c 274: See note following RCW 15.58.050.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.